pl: Gry i zabawki > Łamigłówki: Akcesoria do puzzli; Puzzle; Łamigłówki mechaniczne; Maty i plansze do puzzli; Łamigłówki drewniane i układanki drewniane
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ตัวต่อ: อุปกรณ์ตัวต่อจิ๊กซอว์; ตัวต่อจิ๊กซอว์; ตัวต่อเชิงกล; แผ่นรองและกระดานต่อพัซเซิล; ปริศนากระดานไม้
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Quebra-cabeças: Acessórios para quebra-cabeças; Quebra-cabeças de peças; Quebra-cabeças mecânicos; Tapetes e tabuleiros para quebra-cabeças; Quebra-cabeças de madeira
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Puzzles & Geduldspiele: Puzzle-Zubehör; Puzzles; Mechanische Geduldspiele; Puzzlematten & -bretter; Holzsteckpuzzle
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Puzzles: Acessórios de puzzles quebra-cabeças; Puzzles quebra-cabeças; Puzzles mecânicos; Tapetes e tabuleiros para puzzles; Puzzles em madeira
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Miselne igre: Dodatki za sestavljanke; Sestavljanke; Mehanske miselne igre; Podloge in plošče za sestavljanke; Lesene in paličaste miselne igre
sv: Leksaker och spel > Läggspel: Pusseltillbehör; Pussel; Mekaniska pussel; Pusselmattor och pusselbräden; Träpussel och pussel med knoppar
es: Juegos y juguetes > Rompecabezas: Accesorios para puzles; Puzzles; Rompecabezas mecánico; Tapetes y tableros para rompecabezas; Puzles de madera y con agarrador
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jeux de puzzle: Accessoires pour puzzles; Puzzles classiques; Casse-tête; Tapis et planches pour puzzles; Puzzles à encastrement
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Câu đố: Phụ kiện đồ chơi xếp hình; Trò chơi ghép hình; Câu đố ghép hình; Thảm và bảng ghép hình; Bảng câu đố bằng gỗ có chốt
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Puzzle: Príslušenstvo pre puzzle; Skladačky; Mechanické puzzle; Podložky a dosky na skladanie puzzle; Drevené puzzle a vkladačky
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Пъзел игри: Аксесоари за пъзели; Пъзели; Механични пъзели; Подложки и дъски за пъзели; Дървени и пъзели с формички
ko: 장난감/게임 > 퍼즐: 직소 퍼즐 부대요품; 직소 퍼즐; 조립식 퍼즐; 퍼즐 매트 및 보드; 원목/모양 맞추기 퍼즐
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > パズル: ジグソーパズル関連用品; ジグソーパズル; メカニカルパズル・知恵の輪; パズルマット・ボード; 木製ペグパズル
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Puzzle-uri: Accesorii puzzle tip mozaic; Puzzle-uri tip mozaic; Puzzle-uri mecanice; Covoare și suporturi pentru puzzle; Puzzle-uri din lemn și cu îmbinări
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Pulmapelit: Palapelien lisätarvikkeet; Palapelit; Mekaaniset pulmapelit; Palapelimatot ja -laudat; Puiset ja puupalapulmapelit
el: Παιχνίδια > Παζλ: Αξεσουάρ για παζλ με κομμάτια; Παζλ με κομμάτια; Μηχανικά παζλ; Χαλάκια και επιφάνειες για παζλ; Ξύλινα & καρφωτά παζλ
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Puzzle: Accessori per puzzle; Puzzle in legno; Puzzle meccanici; Tappeti e tavole per puzzle; Puzzle in legno e con pioli
nb: Leker og spill > Pusleleker: Tilbehør til puslespill; Puslespill; Mekaniske pusleleker; Puslespillmatter og -brett; Trepusleleker
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Yapbozlar: Yapboz Aksesuarları; Karton veya Tahta Yapbozlar; Mekanik Yapbozlar; Yapboz matları ve tahtaları; Tahta ve Sabit Yapbozlar
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Puzzle: Pribor za slagalice; Slagalice; Mehaničke puzzle; Podloge i ploče za slagalice; Drvene puzzle i puzzle na ploči
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 益智遊戲: 拼圖配件; 拼圖; 機械性益智玩具; 拼圖墊與拼圖板; 積木拼圖
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Puzzels: Accessoires voor legpuzzels; Legpuzzels; Mechanische puzzels; Puzzelmatten en -borden; Houten puzzels
cs: Hračky a hry > Hlavolamy: Skládačky puzzle – příslušenství; Puzzle; Mechanické puzzle; Podložky a desky na puzzle; Dřevěné a kolíkové puzzle
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Kirakósok: Kirakósjáték-kiegészítők; Kirakós játékok; Mechanikus kirakósok; Puzzleszőnyegek és -táblák; Fa és kötött kirakósok
da: Legetøj og spil > Gådespil: Puslespil – tilbehør; Puslespil; Mekaniske spil; Måtter og plader til puslespil; Træpuslespil med knopper
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Galvosūkiai: Dėlionių priedai; Dėlionės; Mechaniniai galvosūkiai; Dėlionių kilimėliai ir lentos; Mediniai ir strypeliais jungiami galvosūkiai
ru: Игрушки и игры > Паззлы и головоломки: Аксессуары для пазлов; Пазлы; Механические головоломки; Коврики и доски для пазлов; Деревянные головоломки
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 益智玩具/游戏: 拼图配件; 拼图; 机械类益智玩具; 拼图垫和拼图板; 儿童益智拼板
en: Toys & Games > Puzzles: Jigsaw Puzzle Accessories; Jigsaw Puzzles; Mechanical Puzzles; Puzzle Mats & Boards; Wooden & Pegged Puzzles